Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0652.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Film" means single media or multimedia entertainment content for distribution or exhibition to the general public by any means and media in any digital media format, film, or videotape, including, but not limited to, a motion picture, documentary, a television series, a television miniseries, a television special, interstitial television programming, long-form television, interactive television, music videos, interactive games, video games, commercials, internet programming, an internet video, a sound recording, a video, digital animation, or an interactive website. (b) "Local unit of government" means a political subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, a county, city, village, township, district, local authority, intergovernmental authority, or intergovernmental entity. (c) "Michigan film office" or "film office" means the office created under chapter 2A of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2029 to 125.2029g. (c) (d) "Obscene matter or an obscene performance" means matter described in 1984 PA 343, MCL 752.361 to 752.374. Sec. 5. (1) Except as provided under subsection (2), a local unit of government may authorize a person engaged in the production of a film in this state to use, without charge, property owned by or under the control of the local unit of government for the purpose of producing a film under the terms and conditions established by the local unit of government. The economic and other benefits to the local unit of government and this state of film production located in the local unit of government or this state shall be are considered the value received by the local unit of government and this state in exchange for the use of the property owned by or occupied by the local unit of government under this act. (2) A local unit of government shall not authorize the use of property owned by or under the control of the local unit of government for the production of a film that includes obscene matter or an obscene performance or that requires that individually identifiable records be created and maintained for every performer as provided in 18 USC 2257. (3) A local unit of government shall cooperate with the Michigan film office by providing the film office with information about potential film locations within the local unit of government and the use of property owned by or under the control of the local unit of government. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.